New Jersey, session 222, A4625.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Basic generation service or BGS means the same as those terms are defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). Basic generation service provider or provider means the same as those terms are defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). Board means the New Jersey Board of Public Utilities or any successor agency. Commercial and industrial energy pricing class customer or CIEP class customer means the same as those terms are defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). Electric public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that distributes electricity to end users within the State. b.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, the board shall authorize a basic generation service provider to bid for one, two and three-year supply periods during a BGS auction.  The board shall require the selection of the most price competitive bids.  This subsection shall not apply to bids servicing CIEP class customers. c.     The board shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this section, including but not limited to, rules regarding the blending of previously secured three-year supply contracts with newly procured supply contracts. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.